Massachusetts, session 194th, S2872.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1: Section 30A of chapter 85 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting after the words “provisions of chapter ninety” the following words:- ; provided, that a 
farmer or person involved in the harvesting of forest products as defined by the regulations of the 
registry of motor vehicles, who is operating multiple vehicles under a single farm plate 
registration under the provisions of MGL Chapter 90 Section 5, shall only be required to pay a 
single fee which shall cover permits for all vehicles operating under said registration; and 
provided further, that said fee shall be based on that vehicle operating under this registration, 
with the greatest difference between the weight for which the permit is issued and the weight for 
which the vehicle is registered. 
SECTION 2: Section 30A of chapter 85 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
striking the words “or any motor vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer or semi-trailer unit having five or 
more axles which with its load weighs not more than ninety-nine thousand pounds” and inserting 
in place thereof the following:- or any motor vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer or semi-trailer unit 

of 3 14 having five or more axles or operating in combination with a detachable trailer which with its 
load weighs not more than ninety-nine thousand pounds. 
SECTION 3: Section 19A of chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by 
inserting after the words “travel without such a permit” the following words:-  
; provided further, that a truck, motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, semitrailer unit or 
tandem unit in combination with a trailer weighing not more than ninety-nine thousand pounds 
may travel on a public way with such a permit. 
SECTION 4: Section 1 of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following definitions:-  
“Truck-trailer unit”, a motor unit composed of a motor vehicle designed to carry a load 
and having a minimum of three axles, such as a dump truck, log truck, or other truck, paired with 
a trailer having a minimum of two axles. 
SECTION 5: Section 30A of Chapter 85 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 
2022 official edition, is hereby amended by striking the words “motor vehicle, trailer, semi-
trailer or semi-trailer unit” each time it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, 
the words “motor vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer, semi-trailer unit, or truck-trailer unit”. 
SECTION 6:  Section 30A of Chapter 85 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:- 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the weight threshold for 
determination of a superload shall be those vehicles at or in excess of one hundred and ninety-
nine thousand pounds gross vehicle weight. The department shall also implement an application 

of 3 35 and fee schedule for expedited superload permits authorized under this section. A superload 
permit may include conditions and terms as determined by the Administrator; provided further, 
that allowances shall be made for escort flexibility, where practicable, and engineering studies 
conducted not older than 12 months prior. For purposes of this section, a “superload” is defined 
as any vehicle or combination of vehicles which exceed 14 feet in width; or 14 feet in height or 
greater; or greater than 135 feet in length; or one hundred and ninety-nine thousand pounds  or 
greater in gross vehicle weight; or a combination of the above.